North Dakota, session 69, HB1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 23-01-35 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23-01-35. Tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implants, or scarification -
PermitLicense - Fee - Adoption of rules - Exemptions - Injury reports - Penalty .
1. As used in this section:
a. "Body piercing" means any method of piercing the skin or mucosa to place jewelry
through the skin or mucosa.
b. "Branding" means the process in which a mark or marks are burned into human skin
tissue with the intention of leaving a permanent mark.
c. "Scarify" or "scarification" means the practice in which a mark or marks are cut into
human skin tissue with the intention of leaving a permanent mark.
d. "Subdermal implant" means to insert a foreign object beneath the skin to decorate an
individual's body.
e. "Tattoo" or "tattooing" means any method of placing ink or other pigment into or under the
skin or mucosa by the aid of needles or any other instrument used to puncture the skin,
resulting in permanent coloration of the skin or mucosa. This term includes all forms of
cosmetic tattooing.
2. A person may not operate a facility providing tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal
implant, or scarification services without a permitlicense issued by the department under this
section. The holder of a permit shall display the permit in a conspicuous place at the facility for
which the permit is issued. A permit issued under this section expires annually.
a. An applicant for a permitlicense shall submit an application for a permitlicense to the
department, on a form provided by the department, with a permitlicense fee established
by the department. The application must include the name and complete mailing address
and street address of the facility and any other information reasonably required by the
department for the administration of this section.
b. The department shall inspect each facility to ensure compliance with this section and any
rules adopted by the department prior to issuing a license. The operator of a facility shall
grant the department access to the premises of a facility during normal hours of
operation, including access to customer and personnel records. The inspection must be
conducted at a frequency determined by the department and as often as necessary to
ensure compliance with this section and any rules adopted by the department.

H. B. NO. 1071 - PAGE 2
c. The holder of a license shall display the license in a conspicuous place at the facility for
which the license is issued.
d. A license issued under this section expires annually. Within sixty days after December
thirty-first, an expired license may be renewed by submitting the renewal application,
renewal fee, and a late fee established by the department by rule.
e. The license may not be transferable from one place or person to another.
2.3. The department of health and human services shall adopt rules to regulate any person that
receives compensation for engaging in the practice of tattooing, body piercing, branding,
subdermal implants, or scarification. The rules must establish health and safety requirements
and limitations with respect to the age of an individual who may receive a tattoo, body
piercing, or scarification, branding, or subdermal implants and may prohibit any practice that
the department of health and human services deems unsafe or a threat to public health.
3.4. A facility is exempt from subsection 12 if the facility provides body piercing that is limited to the
piercing of the noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear and the facility does not provide
tattooing, branding, scarification, or subdermal implants. A person is exempt from regulation
under subsection 23 if the person's practice under this section is limited to piercing of the
noncartilaginous perimeter or lobe of the ear. A licensed health care professional acting within
that professional's scope of practice and the associated medical facility are exempt from this
section.
4.5. If a customer of a facility regulated under this section reports to the facility an injury the
customer or operator of the facility believes to have resulted from the tattooing, body piercing,
branding, subdermal implanting, or scarification provided at the facility, the operator of the
facility shall provide the customer with written information on how to report the alleged injury to
the department of health and human services. If a licensed health care professional treats a
patient for an injury the professional determines, in the exercise of professional judgment,
occurred as a result of a service regulated under this section, the professional shall report the
circumstances to the department of health and human services. A licensed health care
professional is immune from liability for making or not making a report under this subsection.
5.6. The fees established by the department must be based on the cost of conducting plan
reviews, conducting routine and complaint inspections and enforcement actions, and
preparing and sending license renewals. Fees collected under this section must be deposited
in the department's operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is
subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly. The department shall waive all or a
portion of the fee for any facility that is subject to local jurisdiction.
7. A person operating a facility providing tattooing, body piercing, branding, subdermal implant,
or scarification services without first obtaining a license issued by the department under this
section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor .
8. An individual that receives compensation for engaging in the practice of tattooing, body
piercing, branding, subdermal implant, or scarification services who fails to comply with this
section or any of the rules adopted by the department is guilty of a class B misdemeanor .
9. In addition to the criminal penalties provided in this section, the department may issue a cease
and desist order or obtain a court order or injunction to restrain and enjoin violations of any
provision of this section without proof of actual damages sustained by an individual and
without the department being required to file an undertaking.
10. The department may deny a license application or, after notice and a hearing in accordance
with chapter 28 - 32, suspend, revoke, or take other disciplinary action against the license of an
individual who fails to comply with this section or with any of the rules adopted by the
department.

H. B. NO. 1071 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1071.
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 15 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 8 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State